Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,198
Procedure for judicial dissolution.

(MBCA 14.31) (a) Venue for
a proceeding by the Attorney General to dissolve a corporation lies in the
district court of Lancaster County. Venue for a proceeding brought by any
other party named in subsection (a) of section 21-2,197 lies in the district
court of the county where a corporation's principal office, or, if none in
this state, its registered office, is or was last located.

(b) It is not necessary to
make shareholders parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless
relief is sought against them individually.

(c) A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a
corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente
lite with all powers and duties the court directs, take other action required
to preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the business
of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

(d) Within ten days of the commencement
of a proceeding to dissolve a corporation under subdivision (a)(2) of section
21-2,197, the corporation must send to all shareholders, other than the petitioner,
a notice stating that the shareholders are entitled to avoid the dissolution
of the corporation by electing to purchase the petitioner's shares under section
21-2,201 and accompanied by a copy of section 21-2,201.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 198.